Washington statutes.
RCW 7.44.070

Venue.

The affidavit and bond may be filed, and proceedings had in any county where the defendants may be found.

[Code 1881 s 643; 1877 p 134 s 646; 1869 p 150 s 583; 1854 p 210 s 425; RRS s 784.]